Wyoming statutes. Title 31 Motor Vehicles
Article 12. Offenses, Penalties and Enforcement

Cross references. —

As to revocation or suspension of driver's license or operating privilege, see §§

31-7-123

through

31-7-135

.

As to enforcement of motor vehicle laws by state highway patrol, see §

24-12-102

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

7A Am. Jur. 2d Automobiles and Highway Traffic §§ 244 to 426; 8 Am. Jur. 2d Automobiles and Highway Traffic § 427 et seq.

61A C.J.S. Motor Vehicles §§ 1311 to 1552.

§ 31-5-1201.
Violation of provisions to constitute misdemeanor; penalties; officer training fee.

It is a misdemeanor for any person to violate any of the provisions of this act or rules and regulations authorized under this act unless the violation is by this act or other law of this state declared to be a felony.

Every person convicted of a misdemeanor for a violation of any of the provisions of this act or rules and regulations authorized under this act for which another penalty is not provided shall:

For a first conviction be punished by a fine of not more than two hundred dollars ($200.00);

For a second conviction of the same offense within one (1) year thereafter, be punished by a fine of not more than three hundred dollars ($300.00);

For a third or subsequent conviction of the same offense within one (1) year after the first conviction, be punished by a fine of not more than five hundred dollars ($500.00) or by imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, or both.

Evidence of a prior conviction or convictions under subsection (a) of this section shall not be introduced during the trial of any case, but shall be introduced only after the completion of the trial for the purpose of determining the penalty to be imposed upon a conviction hereunder.

Except as provided in subsection (g) of this section:

through (iii) Repealed by Laws 2018, ch. 117, § 2.

Convictions shall not be considered pursuant to W.S. 31-7-129(a)(i) for driver license suspensions for speeding violations of less than eighty (80) miles per hour where the posted speed limit is at least sixty-five (65) miles per hour or less than six (6) miles per hour over the posted speed limit in all other instances and zones, except speeding violations in school zones, or construction zones;

Notwithstanding W.S.

5-9-107

, court fees and costs for violations of W.S. 31-5-301(b) or (c) and the training fee imposed under subsection (h) of this section shall not be assessed for speeds through five (5) miles per hour over the speed limits authorized by W.S. 31-5-301(b) or (c);

Except for violations in construction or school zones, every person convicted of a violation of W.S. 31-5-301(b)(iii), (iv), (vi), (vii) or (c):

For speeds less than six (6) miles per hour over the legal speed limit, shall be fined five dollars ($5.00) for each mile per hour in excess of the legal speed limit not to exceed twenty-five dollars ($25.00);

For speeds six (6) through ten (10) miles per hour over the legal speed limit, shall be fined thirty dollars ($30.00) plus two dollars ($2.00) for each mile per hour in excess of five (5) miles per hour over the legal speed limit plus assessed fees and costs;

For speeds eleven (11) through twenty (20) miles per hour over the legal speed limit, shall be fined forty-five dollars ($45.00) plus five dollars ($5.00) for each mile per hour in excess of ten (10) miles per hour over the legal speed limit plus assessed fees and costs;

For speeds more than twenty (20) miles per hour over the legal speed limit, shall be fined ninety-five dollars ($95.00) plus five dollars ($5.00) for each mile per hour in excess of twenty (20) miles per hour over the legal speed limit plus assessed fees and costs.

Every person convicted of a violation of W.S. 31-5-301(b)(ii) or speeding in a construction zone:

For speeds less than six (6) miles per hour over the legal speed limit, shall be fined sixty-five dollars ($65.00) plus two dollars ($2.00) for each mile per hour in excess of the legal speed limit;

For speeds six (6) through ten (10) miles per hour over the legal speed limit, shall be fined forty dollars ($40.00) plus seven dollars ($7.00) for each mile per hour in excess of five (5) miles per hour over the legal speed limit plus assessed fees and costs;

For speeds eleven (11) through twenty (20) miles per hour over the legal speed limit, shall be fined ninety-five dollars ($95.00) plus seven dollars ($7.00) for each mile per hour in excess of ten (10) miles per hour over the legal speed limit plus assessed fees and costs;

For speeds more than twenty (20) miles per hour over the legal speed limit, shall be fined one hundred ninety-five dollars ($195.00) plus seven dollars ($7.00) for each mile per hour in excess of twenty (20) miles per hour over the legal speed limit plus assessed fees and costs.

Every person convicted of a violation of speeding in a school zone under W.S. 31-5-301(b)(i):

For speeds less than six (6) miles per hour over the legal speed limit, shall be fined fifty dollars ($50.00) plus two dollars ($2.00) for each mile per hour in excess of the legal speed limit;

For speeds six (6) through ten (10) miles per hour over the legal speed limit, shall be fined ninety-five dollars ($95.00) plus ten dollars ($10.00) for each mile per hour in excess of five (5) miles per hour over the legal speed limit plus assessed fees and costs;

For speeds more than ten (10) miles per hour over the legal speed limit, shall be fined two hundred dollars ($200.00) plus ten dollars ($10.00) for each mile per hour in excess of ten (10) miles per hour over the legal speed limit plus assessed fees and costs;

Upon any subsequent conviction of exceeding the legal speed limit in a school zone as provided in W.S. 31-5-301(b)(i) by more than ten (10) miles per hour within one (1) year, a person shall be fined not less than three hundred ninety-five dollars ($395.00) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00) plus assessed fees and costs.

Any person convicted of a violation of W.S. 31-5-507(a) shall be fined not less than one hundred ninety-five dollars ($195.00) nor more than seven hundred forty-five dollars ($745.00) plus assessed fees and costs. Upon any subsequent conviction of a violation of W.S. 31-5-507(a) within one (1) year, a person shall be fined not less than three hundred ninety-five dollars ($395.00) nor more than nine hundred ninety-five dollars ($995.00) plus assessed fees and costs.

Any person convicted of violating W.S.

31-5-229

shall be punished by a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, or both.

In addition to any other penalty, every person convicted of violating W.S. 31-5-301(b), (c) or

31-5-302

by exceeding the legal speed limit by six (6) or more miles per hour while operating a vehicle or combination of vehicles with a gross vehicle weight or gross vehicle weight rating exceeding thirty-nine thousand (39,000) pounds shall be fined two hundred ninety-five dollars ($295.00) plus assessed fees and costs.

Every person convicted of a violation for which a fine or penalty is set forth under this section shall have imposed in addition to the prescribed fine or penalty and any court fees a police officer continuing education and training fee of five dollars ($5.00) except as provided in paragraph (d)(v) of this section. The fee shall be for police officer as defined in W.S. 31-5-102(a)(xxxiii) continuing education and training that complies with standards promulgated by the peace officers standards and training commission and shall be remitted as provided by W.S. 5-3-205(a)(iii) and

5-9-144

to the account in the enterprise fund under W.S. 9-1-633(n).

Any person convicted of a misdemeanor for a violation of any of the provisions under W.S.

31-5-1102

through

31-5-1108

shall:

For a first conviction be punished by a fine of not more than two hundred dollars ($200.00), by imprisonment for not more than twenty (20) days, or both;

For a second conviction of the same offense within one (1) year thereafter, be punished by a fine of not more than three hundred dollars ($300.00) or by imprisonment for not more than thirty (30) days, or both;

For a third or subsequent conviction of the same offense within one (1) year after the first conviction, be punished by a fine of not more than five hundred dollars ($500.00) or by imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, or both.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 225, § 147; C.S. 1945, § 60-747; W.S. 1957, § 31-234; Laws 1976, ch. 23, § 1; 1980, ch. 22, § 1; 1984, ch. 48, § 1; 1985, ch. 183, § 1; 1987, ch. 131, § 1; 1987, Sp. Sess., ch. 4, § 1; 1997, ch. 61, § 1; 1997, Sp. Sess., ch. 2, § 1; 1998, ch. 46, § 1; 1999, ch. 127, § 1; 2000, ch. 24, § 4; 2004, ch. 64, § 1; 2007, ch. 192, § 1; 2009, ch. 193, § 1; 2015 ch. 139, § 1, effective March 4, 2015; 2015 ch. 109, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; 2016 ch. 43, § 1, effective July 1, 2016; 2016 ch. 114, § 1, effective March 15, 2016; 2018 ch. 117, §§ 1, 2, effective July 1, 2018; 2020 ch. 96, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, in (d)(iv), inserted “posted” before “speed limit” and substituted “at least sixty-five (65) miles per hour or less than six (6) miles per hour over the posted speed limit in all other instances and zones, except speeding violations in school zones, or construction zones” for “sixty-five (65) through seventy-five (75) miles per hour.”

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, rewrote (e).

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, rewrote (g) which read: “In addition to any other penalty, every person convicted of violating W.S. 31-5-301(b)(iii) by exceeding a speed of eighty (80) miles per hour, or W.S. 31-5-301(b)(iv) by exceeding a speed of seventy (70) miles per hour, or W.S. 31-5-301(c) by exceeding the posted speed limit in a construction zone established under W.S.

31-5-302

by six (6) miles per hour, while operating a vehicle or combination of vehicles with a gross vehicle weight or gross vehicle weight rating exceeding twenty-six thousand (26,000) pounds shall be fined one hundred dollars ($100.00).”

The 2015 amendments. —

The first 2015 amendment, by ch. 109, § 1, effective July 1, 2015, in (d)(i), inserted “W.S. 31-5-301(b)(vi), for speeds of eighty-one (81) through eighty-five (85) miles per hour”; in (d)(ii), inserted “W.S. 31-5-301(b)(vi), for speeds above eighty-five (85) miles per hour, or” twice, and substituted “speeds above eighty (80)” for “a speed of eighty (80)”; in (d)(v), substituted “W.S.

5-9-107

” for “W.S. 5-4-207 and

5-9-107

” and
“W.S. 31-5-301(b)(iii), (iv) or (vi)” for “W.S. 31-5-301(b)(iii) or (iv)” twice; in (g), substituted “W.S. 31-5-301(b)(iii), (iv), (vi) or (c)” for “W.S. 31-5-301(b)(iii), (iv) or (c)”; and made related changes.

The second 2015 amendment, by ch. 139, §
1, in (d)(i), inserted “W.S. 31-5-301(b)(vi), for speeds of eighty-one (81) through eighty-five (85) miles per hour”; in (d)(iii), inserted “W.S. 31-5-301(b)(vi), for speeds above eighty-five (85) miles per hour, or” twice, and substituted “speeds above eighty (80)” for “a speed of eighty (80)”; in (d)(v), substituted “W.S.

5-9-107

” for “W.S. 5-4-207 and

5-9-107

” and “W.S. 31-5-301(b)(iii), (iv) or (vi)” for “W.S. 31-5-301(b)(iii)or (iv)” twice; in (g), substituted “W.S. 31-5-301(b)(iii), (iv), (vi) or (c)” for “W.S. 31-5-301(b)(iii), (iv) or (c)”; and made related changes.

Laws 2015, ch. 139, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 4, 2015.

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2016 amendments. —

The first 2016 amendment, by ch. 43 § 1, effective July 1, 2016, substituted “thirty-nine thousand (39,000)” for “twenty-six thousand (26,000)” in (g).

The second 2016 amendment, by ch. 114 § 1, in (d)(i), inserted “W.S. 31-5-301(b)(vii), for speeds of seventy-one (71) through seventy-five (75) miles per hour” preceding “or W.S. 31-5-301(b)(iv)”; in (d)(ii), in the first sentence, inserted “W.S. 31-5-301(b)(vii), for speeds above seventy-five (75) miles per hour, or,” deleted “at or” preceding “above,” and substituted “the legal speed limit” for “seventy (70) miles per hour”; in (d)(v), substituted “(vi) or (vii)” for “or (vi)” twice and substituted “five (5)” for “four (4)”; and in (g) inserted “(vii)” following “(vi),” substituted “thirty-nine thousand (39,000)” for “twenty-six thousand (26,000),” and made a stylistic change.

This section is set out as reconciled by the Wyoming legislative service office.

Laws 2016 ch. 114, § 3, makes the act effective upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 15, 2016.

The 2018 amendments. —

The first 2018 amendment, by ch. 117, § 1, effective July 1, 2018, rewrote (d)(v), which read: “Notwithstanding W.S.

5-9-107

, court costs for violations of W.S. 31-5-301(b)(iii), (iv), (vi) or (vii) shall not be assessed for speeds up to five (5) miles per hour over the speed limits authorized by W.S. 31-5-301(b)(iii), (iv), (vi) or (vii)”; added (d)(vi) through (d)(viii); rewrote (e), which read: “Any person convicted of a violation of W.S. 31-5-507(a) or convicted of exceeding the posted speed limit in a school zone as provided in W.S. 31-5-301(b)(i) by more than ten (10) miles per hour shall be fined not less than two hundred dollars ($200.00) nor more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00). Upon any subsequent conviction of either a violation of W.S. 31-5-507(a) or a conviction of exceeding the posted speed limit in a school zone as provided in W.S. 31-5-301(b)(i) by more than ten (10) miles per hour within one (1) year, a person shall be fined not less than four hundred dollars ($400.00) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00)”; in (g), substituted “W.S. 31-5-301(b), (c) or

31-5-302

” for “W.S. 31-5-301(b)(iii), (iv), (vi), (vii) or (c) or

31-5-302

” following “violating,” substituted “legal” for “posted” preceding “speed limit,” and substituted “two hundred ninety-five dollars ($295.00) plus assessed fees and costs” for “three hundred dollars ($300.00)” at the end; and added (h).

The second 2018 amendment, by ch. 117, § 2, effective July 1, 2018, repealed former (d)(i) through (d)(iii) which read: “(i) Every person convicted of a violation of W.S. 31-5-301(b)(vi), for speeds of eighty-one (81) through eighty-five (85) miles per hour, W.S. 31-5-301(b)(iii), for speeds of seventy-six (76) through eighty (80) miles per hour, W.S. 31-5-301(b)(vii), for speeds of seventy-one (71) through seventy-five (75) miles per hour, or W.S. 31-5-301(b)(iv), for speeds of sixty-six (66) through seventy (70) miles per hour, shall be fined five dollars ($5.00) for each mile per hour in excess of the legal speed limit not to exceed twenty-five dollars ($25.00); (ii) Every person convicted of a violation of W.S. 31-5-301(b)(vii), for speeds above seventy-five (75) miles per hour, or W.S. 31-5-301(b)(iv), for speeds above seventy (70) miles per hour, shall be fined twenty-five dollars ($25.00) plus three dollars ($3.00) per mile for each mile per hour in excess of the legal speed limit with assessed court costs; (iii) Every person convicted of a violation of W.S. 31-5-301(b)(vi), for speeds above eighty-five (85) miles per hour, or W.S. 31-5-301(b)(iii), for speeds above eighty (80) miles per hour, shall be fined at the discretion of the judge but not less than thirty-five dollars ($35.00) nor more than the maximum penalties provided by subsection (b) of this section, with assessed court costs which shall also apply to a violation of W.S. 31-5-301(b)(vi) for speeds above eighty-five (85) miles per hour or W.S. 31-5-301(b)(iii) for speeds above eighty (80) miles per hour.”

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in (b)(i) deleted “by imprisonment for not more than twenty (20) days, or both” at the end; in (b)(ii) deleted “or by imprisonment for not more than thirty (30) days, or both” at the end; and added (j).

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to throughout subsection (a) and in the introductory language of subsection (b), see § 31-5-102(a)(lix).

Applicability of exclusion in subsection (d). —

Subsection (d)(iii) does not prevent the motor vehicle division from including as a moving violation for purposes of a suspension proceeding, pursuant to § 31-7-129(a)(i), a violation for speeding less than 75 miles per hour in a 50-mile-per-hour zone; the exclusion contained in subsection (d)(iii) comes into effect only if the speed limit specifically set in § 31-5-301(b)(iii) (55 (now 75) miles per hour) has been violated. Department of Revenue & Taxation, Motor Vehicle Div. v. Andrews, 671 P.2d 1239,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 377

(Wyo. 1983); Department of Revenue & Taxation v. Guadagnoli, 677 P.2d 823,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 262

(Wyo. 1984) (decided prior to 1984 revision of this title).

Prolonged detention not supported. —

Officer had probable cause to stop defendant because officer had observed a speeding violation, but the prolonged detention and pat-down search of defendant was not supported by a reasonable suspicion of criminal activity based alone on defendant's unusual nervousness, that the car floor covered with fast food wrappers, and that luggage was in the back seat, and as such evidence of drugs found in defendant's trunk was suppressed. Damato v. State, 2003 WY 13, 64 P.3d 700,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(Wyo. 2003).

Stated

in

Phelps v. State, 2012 WY 87, 278 P.3d 1148,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 92

(June 19, 2012).

Cited

in

Grayson v. Williams, 256 F.2d 61, 1958 U.S. App. LEXIS 4930 (10th Cir. 1958).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Entrapment to commit traffic offense, 34 ALR4th 1167.

§ 31-5-1202.
Parties to crime.

Every person who commits, attempts to commit, conspires to commit, or aids or abets in the commission of, any act declared herein [in this chapter] to be a crime, whether individually or in connection with one (1) or more other persons or as a principal, agent or accessory, is guilty of the offense, and every person who falsely, fraudulently, forcibly or willfully induces, causes, coerces, requires, permits or directs another to violate any provision of this act is likewise guilty of the offense.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 225, § 148; C.S. 1945, § 60-748; W.S. 1957, § 31-235; Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to criminal liability, see §

6-1-201

et seq.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 31-5-102(a)(lix).

§ 31-5-1203.
Unlawful acts by persons owning or controlling vehicles.

It is unlawful for the owner or any other person, employing or otherwise directing the driver of any vehicle to require or knowingly to permit the operation of the vehicle upon a highway in any manner contrary to law.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 225, § 149; C.S. 1945, § 60-749; W.S. 1957, § 31-236; Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1.

§ 31-5-1204.
Authority to make arrest; general arrest procedures; arrest of nonresidents.

The authority of a police officer to make an arrest is the same as upon an arrest for a felony when the officer has reasonable and probable grounds to believe that the person arrested has committed any of the following offenses and the manner of making arrests shall be as in misdemeanor cases:

Negligent homicide or homicide by vehicle;

Driving or being in actual physical control of a vehicle while under the influence of alcohol or any substance as prohibited by W.S.

31-5-233

;

Failure to stop, failure to give information or failure to render reasonable assistance, in the event of an accident resulting in death or personal injuries as prescribed in W.S.

31-5-1101

and

31-5-1103

;

Failure to stop or give information in the event of an accident resulting in damage to a vehicle or other property as prescribed in W.S.

31-5-1102

through

31-5-1104

;

Reckless driving;

Racing on the highway; or

Willfully fleeing from or attempting to elude a police officer.

Whenever any person is arrested as authorized in this section he shall be taken without unnecessary delay before the proper court as specified in W.S. 31-5-1205(g), except that in the case of any of the offenses designated in paragraphs (a)(iv) through (vii) of this section, a police officer shall have the same discretion as is provided in other cases in subsection (d) of this section.

Whenever any person is halted by a police officer for any violation of this act, he shall be taken without unnecessary delay before the proper court as specified in W.S. 31-5-1205(g), in any of the following cases:

When the person demands an immediate appearance before a judge; or

In any other event when the person is issued a traffic citation by a police officer and refuses to give his promise to appear in court manifested by his refusal to accept the citation.

Whenever any person is halted by a police officer for any violation of this act and is not required to be taken before a court as provided by subsection (c) of this section, the person shall, in the discretion of the officer, either be given a traffic citation or be taken without unnecessary delay before the proper judge, as specified in W.S. 31-5-1205(g), in any of the following cases:

When the person does not furnish satisfactory evidence of identity or when the officer has reasonable and probable grounds to believe the person will disregard a promise to appear in court;

When the person is charged with a violation of W.S.

31-5-959

, relating to vehicles transporting hazardous materials;

When the person is charged with a violation of W.S.

31-18-804

.

A police officer who arrests a nonresident of this state for any violation of this act may instead of issuing a traffic citation containing notice to appear in court, take the nonresident without unnecessary delay before the proper court, as specified in W.S. 31-5-1205(g) or pursuant to W.S. 31-5-1205(h) require that the bond be posted in accord with an adopted bond schedule and which may be accepted by the arresting officer for delivery to the court.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 225, § 150; C.S. 1945, § 60-750; W.S. 1957, § 31-237; Laws 1973, ch. 166, § 1; 1982, ch. 51, § 1; 1984, ch. 48, § 1; 2011, ch. 167, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to homicide by vehicle, see §

6-2-106

.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, deleted “written” preceding “promise” in (c)(ii) and (d)(i); and in (c)(ii), substituted “manifested by his refusal to accept the citation” for “as hereinafter provided.”

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 31-5-102(a)(lix).

Authority statutes. —

Both §

7-2-103

and this section are authority statutes, in that they address only what a peace officer may do in his official capacity without running afoul of the due process provisions of the United States and Wyoming Constitutions; they are not jurisdictional statutes. State v. Stahl, 838 P.2d 1193,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 147

(Wyo. 1992).

Discretionary function. —

District court properly dismissed wrongful death action against police officer who did not arrest an intoxicated motorist following a traffic stop; a police officer's decision to arrest is a discretionary function, not mandated by Wyoming statutes. McCoy v. Crook County Sheriff's Dep't, 987 P.2d 674,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 146

(Wyo. 1999).

Municipal peace officer acting without warrant

may not lawfully arrest an individual for DWUI outside of the boundaries of the municipality which he serves, unless such arrest is the result of fresh pursuit. State v. Stahl, 838 P.2d 1193,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 147

(Wyo. 1992).

Sheriff could have owed a duty to have arrested intoxicated driver. —

Trial court erred in dismissing a wrongful death action brought by mother against sheriff and county, on behalf of her son who was killed by an intoxicated driver; after determining that the intoxicated driver immediately intended to drive to follow an ambulance to the hospital to be with an injured friend, the sheriff had a duty to do what an ordinarily prudent law enforcement officer would have done under like circumstances.
Becker v. Mason, 2006 WY 143, 145 P.3d 1268,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 155

(Wyo. 2006).

Applied

in

Sandborn v. State, 735 P.2d 435,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 420

(Wyo. 1987); Coryell v. Town of Pinedale, 745 P.2d 883,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 541

(Wyo. 1987).

§ 31-5-1205.
Traffic citations; notice to appear in court; release upon written promise to appear; procedure before judge or court; arrest for driving under the influence.

Whenever a person is halted by a police officer for any violation of this act punishable as a misdemeanor, and is not taken before a judge as required or permitted, the officer shall prepare a written traffic citation containing a notice to appear in court.

The time specified in the notice to appear must be at least five (5) days after the alleged violation unless the person charged with the violation demands an earlier hearing.

The place specified in the notice to appear must be before a judge as designated in subsection (g) of this section.

The person charged with the violation may give his promise to appear in court by accepting at least one (1) copy of the written traffic citation prepared by the officer, in which event the officer shall deliver a copy of the citation to the person, and thereupon, the officer shall not take the person into physical custody for the violation.

Any officer violating any of the provisions of this section is guilty of misconduct in office and is subject to removal from office.

Except for felonies and those offenses enumerated in W.S. 31-5-1204(a)(i), (ii) and (iii), a police officer at the scene of a traffic accident may issue a written traffic citation, as provided in subsection (a) of this section, to any driver of a vehicle involved in the accident when, based upon personal investigation, the officer has reasonable and probable grounds to believe that the person has committed any offense under the provisions of this act in connection with the accident.

Whenever any person is taken before a judge or is given a written traffic citation containing a notice to appear before a judge, the judge shall be a judge within the county in which the offense charged is alleged to have been committed and who has jurisdiction of the offense and is nearest or most accessible with reference to the place where the alleged violation occurred. For the purpose of this section, the terms “judge” and “court” includes judges and courts having jurisdiction of offenses under this act as committing judges and courts and those having jurisdiction of the trials of the offenses.

Whenever any person is taken into custody by a police officer for the purpose of taking him before a judge or court as authorized or required in this act upon any charge other than a felony or the offenses enumerated in W.S. 31-5-1204(a)(i), (ii) and (iii), and no judge is available at the time of arrest, and there is no bail schedule established by the judge or court and no lawfully designated court clerk or other public officer who is available and authorized to accept bail upon behalf of the judge or court, the person shall be released from custody upon the issuance to him of a written traffic citation and his acceptance of the citation signifying his promise to appear as provided in subsection (d) of this section.

The procedure prescribed by this section is not exclusive to this act, but is applicable in all proceedings arising out of an alleged violation of a statute, ordinance or regulation relating to operation or use of any vehicle or to use of the highways.

If a person is arrested, cited or issued a summons for violation of W.S.

31-5-233

or a municipal ordinance which substantially conforms to the provisions of W.S.

31-5-233

or for a violation as defined in W.S. 31-5-234(d), he shall surrender possession of his physical driver’s license, if applicable, whether issued in Wyoming or another jurisdiction, to the arresting or issuing officer. In addition to other requirements of this section and W.S.

31-5-1204

, the officer shall issue a temporary license pursuant to W.S.

31-6-102

,

31-6-108

or

31-7-138

to the person arrested or cited and shall forward the surrendered license to the department.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 225, § 151; C.S. 1945, § 60-751; W.S. 1957, § 31-238; Laws 1973, ch. 166, § 1; 1984, ch. 41, § 3, ch. 48, § 1; 1985, ch. 211, § 1; ch. 234, § 1; 1987, ch. 131, § 1; 1991, ch. 241, § 3; 1998, ch. 102, § 2; 2011, ch. 167, § 1; 2020 ch. 15, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in (d), deleted “written” preceding “promise,” and substituted “accepting” for “signing”; and in (h), substituted “acceptance of the citation signifying his” for “signing a.”

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in (k), added “physical” preceding “driver’s license” and “if applicable” following “driver’s license.”

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 31-5-102(a)(lix).

No legal duty to arrest. —

District court properly dismissed wrongful death action against police officer who did not arrest an intoxicated motorist following a traffic stop; a police officer's decision to arrest is a discretionary function, not mandated by Wyoming statutes. McCoy v. Crook County Sheriff's Dep't, 987 P.2d 674,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 146

(Wyo. 1999).

Sheriff could have owed a duty to have arrested intoxicated driver. —

Trial court erred in dismissing a wrongful death action brought by mother against sheriff and county, on behalf of her son who was killed by an intoxicated driver; after determining that the intoxicated driver immediately intended to drive to follow an ambulance to the hospital to be with an injured friend, the sheriff had a duty to do what an ordinarily prudent law enforcement officer would have done under like circumstances.
Becker v. Mason, 2006 WY 143, 145 P.3d 1268,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 155

(Wyo. 2006).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “The New Implied Consent Amendments: A Step in the Right Direction,” see XXI Land & Water L. Rev. 165 (1986).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

What constitutes “minor traffic infraction” excludible from calculation of defendant's criminal history under United States Sentencing Guideline § 4A1.2(c)(2), 113 ALR Fed 561.

§ 31-5-1206.
Violation of promise to appear; appearance by counsel.

It is unlawful for any person to violate his promise to appear given to an officer upon the issuance of a traffic citation regardless of the disposition of the charge for which the citation was originally issued.

A promise to appear in court may be complied with by an appearance by counsel.

Failure to appear as defined in this section is a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not less than twenty-five dollars ($25.00) nor more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, or both.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 225, § 152; C.S. 1945, § 60-752; W.S. 1957, § 31-239; Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1; 1998, ch. 45, § 1; 2011, ch. 167, § 1.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in (a) and (b), deleted “written” preceding “promise.”

§ 31-5-1207.
Procedure not exclusive.

The provisions of W.S.

31-5-1204

through

31-5-1206

shall govern all police officers in making arrests without a warrant for violations of this act, but the procedure prescribed herein is not exclusive of any other method prescribed by law for the arrest and prosecution of a person for an offense of like grade.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 225, § 153; C.S. 1945, § 60-753; W.S. 1957, § 31-240; Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 31-5-102(a)(lix).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

What constitutes “minor traffic infraction” excludible from calculation of defendant's criminal history under United States Sentencing Guideline § 4A1.2(c)(2), 113 ALR Fed 561.

§ 31-5-1208.
Inadmissibility of evidence of conviction.

No evidence of the conviction of any person for any violation of this act is admissible in any court in any civil action.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 225, § 154; C.S. 1945, § 60-754; W.S. 1957, § 31-241; Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 31-5-102(a)(lix).

Purpose of section. —

See Haley v. Dreesen, 532 P.2d 399,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 132

(Wyo. 1975).

Plea of guilty and conviction are not same thing.

Haley v. Dreesen, 532 P.2d 399,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 132

(Wyo. 1975).

And use of guilty plea not prohibited. —

It is reasonable to assume that when this section was enacted prohibiting the use of a conviction in a civil trial, the legislature did not include a plea of guilty therein. Haley v. Dreesen, 532 P.2d 399,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 132

(Wyo. 1975).

Evidence that driver given traffic citation harmless errorin trial to court. —

In an action arising out of an automobile collision, this section appears to exclude evidence that the driver had been given a citation for a traffic violation and that he had forfeited the bond given in connection therewith, but in a trial to the court without a jury, if there is error it is not prejudicial. Adams v. Erickson, 394 F.2d 171, 1968 U.S. App. LEXIS 6998 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1968).

§ 31-5-1209.
Effect of conviction upon credibility of witness.

The conviction of a person upon a charge of violating any provision of this act or other traffic regulation less than a felony shall not affect or impair the credibility of the person as a witness in any civil or criminal proceeding.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 225, § 155; C.S. 1945, § 60-755; W.S. 1957, § 31-242; Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 31-5-102(a)(lix).

§ 31-5-1210.
Traffic citation books.

The chief administrative officer of every traffic enforcement agency is responsible for the issuance of traffic citation books and shall maintain a record of every book and each citation contained therein issued to individual members of the traffic enforcement agency and shall require and retain a receipt for every book so issued.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 225, § 156; C.S. 1945, § 60-756; W.S. 1957, § 31-243; Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1.

§ 31-5-1211.
Disposition and records of traffic citations.

Every traffic enforcement officer upon issuing a traffic citation to an alleged violator of any provision of the motor vehicle laws of this state or of any traffic ordinance of any city or town shall deposit the original or a copy of the traffic citation with a court having jurisdiction over the alleged offense or with its traffic violations bureau.

Upon the deposit of the original or a copy of the traffic citation with a court having jurisdiction over the alleged offense or with its traffic violations bureau as aforesaid, the original or copy of the traffic citation may be disposed of only by trial in court or other official action by a judge of the court, including forfeiture of the bail, or by the deposit of sufficient bail with or payment of a fine to the traffic violations bureau by the person to whom the traffic citation was issued by the traffic enforcement officer.

It is unlawful and official misconduct for any traffic enforcement officer or other officer or public employee to dispose of a traffic citation or copies thereof or of the record of the issuance of the same in a manner other than as required by this act.

The chief administrative officer of every traffic enforcement agency shall require the return to him of a copy of every traffic citation issued by an officer under his supervision to an alleged violator of any traffic law or ordinance and of all copies of every traffic citation which has been spoiled or upon which any entry has been made and not issued to an alleged violator.

The chief administrative officer shall also maintain or cause to be maintained in connection with every traffic citation issued by an officer under his supervision a record of the disposition of the charge by the court or its traffic violations bureau in which the original or copy of the traffic citation was deposited.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 225, § 157; C.S. 1945, § 60-757; W.S. 1957, § 31-244; Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in subsection (c), see § 31-5-102(a)(lix).

§ 31-5-1212.
Audit of traffic citation records; annual summary of traffic violation notices.

Every record of traffic citations required in W.S.

31-5-1201

through

31-5-1214

, shall be audited annually by the appropriate fiscal officer of the governmental agency to which the traffic enforcement agency is responsible.

The fiscal officer shall publish or cause to be published an annual summary of all traffic violation notices issued by the traffic enforcement agency and the dispositions thereof in at least one (1) local daily newspaper of general circulation.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 225, § 158; C.S. 1945, § 60-758; W.S. 1957, § 31-245; Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1.

§ 31-5-1213.
Use of citations as lawful complaints.

In the event the form of citation provided under W.S.

31-5-1210

includes information and is sworn to as required under the general laws of this state in respect to a complaint charging commission of the offense alleged in the citation to have been committed, then the citation when filed with a court having jurisdiction shall be deemed to be a lawful complaint for the purpose of prosecution under this act.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 225, § 159; C.S. 1945, § 60-759; W.S. 1957, § 31-246; Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 31-5-102(a)(lix).

Unsworn traffic citation invokes municipal court's jurisdiction.—

An unsworn traffic citation which was issued and which charged a violation of a town ordinance was sufficient to invoke the jurisdiction of the municipal court. Freeman v. Lusk, 717 P.2d 331,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 524

(Wyo. 1986).